Indiana, session 2026, HB1415.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 32-30-6-1.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 1.3. As used in this chapter, "area of the racing
facility or racetrack" means the area located within a five (5) mile
radius of the perimeter of the property or contiguous group of
properties operated as a racing facility or racetrack.
SECTION 2. IC 32-30-6-4.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. As used in this chapter, "racing facility or
racetrack" means a designated area or facility where competitive
vehicle and motorsport races are conducted. The term includes the
track, spectator areas, garages, and any associated grounds,
buildings, or appurtenances used to operate the races.
SECTION 3. IC 32-30-6-8.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. (a) This section does not apply if a nuisance
results from the negligent operation of a racing facility or
2026 IN 1415—LS 6433/DI 116


racetrack or the racing facility's or racetrack's appurtenances.
(b) A racing facility or racetrack or any of its appurtenances is
not and does not become a nuisance, public or private, within the
area of the racing facility or racetrack, in an action brought by a
person who purchased or improved property within the area of the
racing facility or racetrack or its appurtenances after the racing
facility or racetrack initially commenced operation as a racing
facility or racetrack.
(c) Subsection (b) applies to a racing facility or racetrack
regardless of any changes to the:
(1) size, scope, or configuration of the racing facility or
racetrack;
(2) technology used at the racing facility or racetrack;
(3) type of racing conducted at the racing facility or
racetrack; or
(4) ownership of the racing facility or racetrack.
(d) Subject to subsection (e), a political subdivision (as defined
in IC 36-1-2-13) may not adopt or enforce any ordinance,
resolution, or regulation that would restrict, limit, or prohibit the
operation of a racing facility or racetrack in a manner inconsistent
with subsection (b).
(e) This section may not be construed to exempt a racing facility
or racetrack from compliance with federal, state, or local health or
safety laws or ordinances.
2026 IN 1415—LS 6433/DI 116